Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6826
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Managed Care Emergency Services Act is to establish standards for health carriers that offer managed care plans to provide for access by covered persons to and delivery of emergency services.

Laws 1997, LB 279, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 44-6802;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 18.